New Jersey, session 222, A4774.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 46 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-46) is amended to read as follows: 46.  a.  Any person serving as a member of a housing authority or a redevelopment agency on or after the effective date of the rules adopted pursuant to section 45 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-45) shall satisfactorily complete the course of study prescribed by the commissioner within [eighteen] 18 months following the date of appointment or July 1, 1997, whichever is later, or shall be deemed to have resigned his position effective at the end of that period of time. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a person serving as a member of a housing authority or redevelopment agency on the effective date of the rules adopted pursuant to section 45 of P.L.1992, c.79 may continue to serve to the end of his appointed term even if the remaining period in that term exceeds eighteen months and the member does not satisfactorily complete the prescribed course of study within that time.  However, such a member shall not be eligible for reappointment to membership on the housing authority or redevelopment agency until a period of five years has elapsed following the completion of the member's term. b.  Any person serving as the executive director of a housing authority or redevelopment agency on or after the effective date of the rules adopted pursuant to section 45 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-45) shall satisfactorily complete the course of study prescribed by the commissioner within two years after the effective date of the rules or the effective date of his appointment, whichever is later, or shall be deemed to have resigned his position effective at the end of that period of time. c.  Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, regulation, or this section to the contrary, any person deemed to have resigned his position pursuant to subsection a. or b. of this section and who has been replaced by another appointee shall have no claim to the appointment. d.  A qualified candidate may request that the commissioner waive the requirement to complete a course of study, or portion of a course of study, required pursuant to subsection a. or b. of this section, or pursuant to associated regulations.  A request to waive a requirement shall be approved or denied at the discretion of the commissioner based on the commissioners assessment of the experience of the qualified candidate. (cf: P.L.1997, c.27, s.1.) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.